District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.18

Deposit of security — Exceptions.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 125, ch. 222, § 18
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 955, Pub. L. 85-792, § 6
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155, § 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-418.
1973 Ed., § 40-434.